Florida, session 2026, SB1216.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 17 18 Section 1.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1) of section 19 1012.22, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 20 1012.22âPublic school personnel; powers and duties of the 21 district school board.âThe district school board shall: 22 (1)âDesignate positions to be filled, prescribe 23 qualifications for those positions, and provide for the 24 appointment, compensation, promotion, suspension, and dismissal 25 of employees as follows, subject to the requirements of this 26 chapter: 27 (c)âCompensation and salary schedules.â 28 1.âDefinitions.âAs used in this paragraph: 29 a.ââAdjustmentâ means an addition to the base salary 30 schedule that is not a bonus and becomes part of the employeeâs 31 permanent base salary and is shall be considered compensation 32 under s. 121.021(22). 33 b.ââGrandfathered salary scheduleâ means the salary 34 schedule or schedules adopted by a district school board before 35 July 1, 2014, pursuant to subparagraph 4. 36 c.ââInstructional personnelâ means instructional personnel 37 as defined in s. 1012.01(2)(a)-(d), excluding substitute 38 teachers. 39 d.ââPerformance salary scheduleâ means the salary schedule 40 or schedules adopted by a district school board pursuant to 41 subparagraph 5. 42 e.ââSalary scheduleâ means any the schedule or schedules 43 used to provide the base salary for district school board 44 personnel. 45 f.ââSchool administratorâ means a school administrator as 46 defined in s. 1012.01(3)(c). 47 g.ââSupplementâ means an annual addition to the base salary 48 for the term of the negotiated supplement as long as the 49 employee continues his or her employment for the purpose of the 50 supplement. A supplement does not become part of the employeeâs 51 continuing base salary but is shall be considered compensation 52 under s. 121.021(22). 53 2.âCost-of-living adjustment.âA district school board may 54 provide a cost-of-living salary adjustment to district 55 employees, including, but not limited to, instructional 56 personnel as defined in s. 1012.01(2), prekindergarten teachers, 57 noninstructional personnel, and school administrators as defined 58 in s. 1012.01(3)(c), if the adjustment: 59 a.âdoes not discriminate among comparable classes of 60 employees based upon the salary schedule under which they are 61 compensated. A cost-of-living adjustment does not preclude a 62 district school board from providing other salary adjustments 63 from additional funding sources, including categorical funding 64 and the classroom teacher and other instructional personnel 65 salary increase under s. 1011.62(14) and supplemental funding 66 sources, including grants. 67 b.âDoes not exceed 50 percent of the annual adjustment 68 provided to instructional personnel rated as effective. 69 3.âAdvanced degrees.âA district school board may use 70 advanced degrees in setting a salary schedule for instructional 71 personnel or school administrators if the advanced degree is 72 held in the individualâs area of certification, a field related 73 to his or her teaching assignment, or a related field of study. 74 For purposes of the salary schedule, an advanced degree may 75 include a masterâs degree or higher that is in the area of 76 certification or teaching assignment, or an advanced degree in 77 another field with a minimum of 18 graduate semester hours 78 related to the individualâs area of certification or teaching 79 assignment. 80 4.âGrandfathered salary schedule.â 81 a.âThe district school board shall adopt a salary schedule 82 or salary schedules to be used as the basis for paying all 83 school employees hired before July 1, 2014. Instructional 84 personnel on annual contract as of July 1, 2014, shall be placed 85 on the performance salary schedule adopted under subparagraph 5. 86 Instructional personnel on continuing contract or professional 87 service contract may opt into the performance salary schedule if 88 the employee relinquishes such contract and agrees to be 89 employed on an annual contract under s. 1012.335. Such an 90 employee shall be placed on the performance salary schedule and 91 may not return to continuing contract or professional service 92 contract status. Any employee who opts into the performance 93 salary schedule may not return to the grandfathered salary 94 schedule. 95 b.âIn determining the grandfathered salary schedule for 96 instructional personnel, a district school board must base a 97 portion of each employeeâs compensation upon performance 98 demonstrated under s. 1012.34 and shall provide differentiated 99 pay for both instructional personnel and school administrators 100 based upon district-determined factors, including, but not 101 limited to, additional responsibilities, school demographics, 102 high-demand teacher needs areas, advanced degrees, and level of 103 job performance difficulties. 104 5.âPerformance salary schedule.âBy July 1, 2014, The 105 district school board shall adopt a performance salary schedule 106 that provides annual salary adjustments for instructional 107 personnel and school administrators based upon performance 108 determined under s. 1012.34. Employees hired on or after July 1, 109 2014, or employees who choose to move from the grandfathered 110 salary schedule to the performance salary schedule shall be 111 compensated pursuant to the performance salary schedule once 112 they have received the appropriate performance evaluation for 113 this purpose. 114 a.âBase salary.âThe base salary shall be established as 115 follows: 116 (I)âThe base salary for instructional personnel or school 117 administrators who opt into the performance salary schedule 118 shall be the salary paid in the prior year, including 119 adjustments only. 120 (II)âInstructional personnel or school administrators new 121 to the district, returning to the district after a break in 122 service without an authorized leave of absence, or appointed for 123 the first time to a position in the district in the capacity of 124 instructional personnel or school administrator shall be placed 125 on the performance salary schedule. 126 b.âSalary adjustments.âSalary adjustments for highly 127 effective or effective performance shall be established as 128 follows: 129 (I)âThe annual salary adjustment under the performance 130 salary schedule for an employee rated as highly effective must 131 be at least 25 percent greater than the highest annual salary 132 adjustment available to an employee of the same classification 133 through any other salary schedule adopted by the district. 134 (II)âThe annual salary adjustment under the performance 135 salary schedule for an employee rated as effective must be equal 136 to at least 50 percent and no more than 75 percent of the annual 137 adjustment provided for a highly effective employee of the same 138 classification. 139 (III)âA salary schedule shall not provide An annual salary 140 adjustment shall only be provided for an employee who receives a 141 rating of other than highly effective or effective for the year. 142 c.âSalary supplements.âIn addition to the salary 143 adjustments, each district school board shall provide for salary 144 supplements for activities that must include, but are not 145 limited to: 146 (I)âAssignment to a Title I eligible school. 147 (II)âAssignment to a school that earned a grade of âFâ or 148 three consecutive grades of âDâ pursuant to s. 1008.34 such that 149 the supplement remains in force for at least 1 year following 150 improved performance in that school. 151 (III)âCertification and teaching in high-demand teacher 152 needs areas. Statewide high-demand teacher needs areas shall be 153 identified by the State Board of Education under s. 1012.07. 154 However, the district school board may identify other areas of 155 high-demand needs within the school district for purposes of 156 this sub-sub-subparagraph and may remove areas identified by the 157 state board which do not apply within the school district. 158 (IV)âAssignment of additional academic responsibilities. 159 160 If budget constraints in any given year limit a district school 161 boardâs ability to fully fund all adopted salary schedules, the 162 performance salary schedule may shall not be reduced on the 163 basis of total cost or the value of individual awards in a 164 manner that is proportionally greater than reductions to any 165 other salary schedules adopted by the district. Any compensation 166 for longevity of service awarded to instructional personnel who 167 are on any other salary schedule must be included in calculating 168 the salary adjustments required by sub-subparagraph b. 169 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.